Mississippi, session 2026, SB2931.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Chapter 901, Local and Private Laws of 2022, is amended as follows: Section 1.  The governing authorities of the City of Natchez, Mississippi, are authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to contribute an amount not * * * less more than * * * One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) each fiscal year to Natchez, Inc., a Mississippi nonprofit corporation organized for economic development purposes. Section 2.  The Board of Supervisors of Adams County, Mississippi, is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to contribute an amount not * * * less more than * * * One Hundred Sixty‑five Thousand Dollars ($165,000.00) Two Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($225,000.00) each fiscal year to Natchez, Inc., a Mississippi nonprofit corporation organized for economic development purposes. Section 3.  This act shall be repealed from and after July 1, * * * 2026 2030. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.